Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1620
School; authority
to award associate degrees;
commissioner; authorize.

A school which has been accredited pursuant
to section 85-1619 may apply to the department for authority to award associate
degrees. Upon determining that the quality of the courses of instruction at
the applicant school meets the standards established in the department's rules
and regulations, the commissioner may grant the applicant the authority to
award an associate degree and shall issue a certificate setting forth the
programs for which the associate degree may be awarded. Such authorization
shall continue so long as the school remains accredited.

Laws 1982, LB 370, § 5;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 20;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2820.01;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 20;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 32;

Laws 2011, LB637, § 31.